Washington statutes.
RCW 32.08.160

Writing of fire insurance restricted.

When a savings bank is itself acting as an insurance agent, a trustee, officer, or employee of the bank shall not act as an insurance agent to write fire insurance on property in which the bank has an insurable interest, and no part of a room used by a savings bank in the transaction of its business shall be occupied or used by any person other than the bank in the writing of fire insurance.

[ 1955 c 13 s 32.08.160. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 86 s 7; RRS s 3342a.]